District of Columbia statutes.
46-353.02

Proceeding by minor parent.

A minor parent, or a guardian or other legal representative of a minor parent, may maintain a proceeding on behalf of or for the benefit of the minor’s child.

Feb. 27, 2016, D.C. Law 21-73, § 302, 63 DCR 222